Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.100

Payment on death in line of duty or while retired on account of service-connected disability.

In the event a firefighter is killed in the performance of duty, or in the event a firefighter retired on account of service-connected disability shall die from any cause, his widow or her widower shall receive a monthly pension under one of the following applicable provisions: (1) If a firefighter is killed in the line of duty his widow or her widower shall receive a monthly pension equal to fifty percent of his or her basic salary at the time of his or her death; (2) if a firefighter who has retired on account of a service-connected disability dies, his widow or her widower shall receive a monthly pension equal to the amount of the monthly pension such retired firefighter was receiving at the time of his or her death. If she or he at any time so elects in writing and the board after hearing finds it to be financially beneficial to the pension fund, he or she may receive in lieu of all future monthly pension and other benefits, including benefits to child or children, the sum of five thousand dollars in cash. If there be no widow or widower at the time of such firefighter's death or upon the widow's or widower's death the monthly pension benefits provided for under this section shall be paid to and divided among his or her child or children share and share alike, until they reach the age of eighteen or are married, whichever occurs first. A pension payable under the provisions of this section shall not be less than that specified under RCW 41.18.200.

[ 2009 c 156 s 3; 2007 c 218 s 51; 1975 1st ex.s. c 178 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 73; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 28; 1965 ex.s. c 45 s 4; 1955 c 382 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Construction—1975 1st ex.s. c 178: See RCW 41.16.921.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Effective date—Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.26.3901, 41.26.3902, and 41.26.3903.